Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1420.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-2927, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-2927. Unlawful feeding of wildlife; classification A. A person commits unlawful feeding of wildlife by intentionally, knowingly or recklessly feeding, attracting or otherwise enticing wildlife into an area, except for: 1. Persons lawfully taking or holding wildlife pursuant to title 17 or pursuant to rules or orders of the Arizona game and fish commission. 2. Public employees or authorized agents acting within the scope of their authority for public safety or for wildlife management purposes. 3. Normal agricultural or livestock operational practices. 4. Tree squirrels or birds except pigeons. B. This section applies in a county with a population of more than two hundred eighty thousand persons. C. Unlawful feeding of wildlife is a petty offense. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 13, chapter 29, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-2927.01, to read: START_STATUTE13-2927.01. Unlawful feeding of pigeons; penalties; classification; definitions A. It is unlawful for a person to feed pigeons. b. This section does not: 1. Apply to a person who keeps pigeons in an enclosure: (a) That is not located in the front yard area of the property on which the pigeons are kept. (b) That has at least one square foot of floor space for each mature pigeon that is kept or housed in the enclosure. (c) That is in compliance with applicable provisions of city or town Zoning and Building codes. (d) In which the person feeds and waters the pigeons within the confines of the enclosure and does not provide food and water for pigeons outside of the enclosure. (e) That is kept in such condition that no smell or odor arises from the enclosure to the injury, annoyance or inconvenience of a reasonable person of ordinary sensitivities. 2. Prohibit a person from feeding other birds using practices or devices that are designed to prevent pigeons from obtaining food. 3. Prohibit a person from feeding pigeons in accordance with a government-approved plan for wildlife management. C. A PERSON MAY BRING A PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION. D. A person who violates this section: 1. For a first violation, is subject to a warning. 2. For a second violation, is subject to The imposition of a civil penalty of $100. 3. For a third or subsequent violation, is guilty of a petty offense. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Feed" means to knowingly provide food. 2. "Food" includes grains, seeds, greens, bread, breadcrumbs, fishmeal, waste food, food scraps or other feed or nutritive substances including garbage that is not properly disposed of or contained. 3. "Pigeon" means any bird of the family columbidae and species columba livia, commonly known as the rock dove, homing pigeon or carrier pigeon. END_STATUTE